apertium-cy-en.en.dix.xml
<pardef n="accept__vblex__sep">
                        <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

</pardef>
</pardefs>

                        <e lm="check out"><i>check</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="pick up"><i>pick</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="pull out"><i>pull</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="slow down"><i>slow</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="turn into"><i>turn</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>into</l><r><g><b/>into</g></r></p></e>
                        <e lm="turn off"><i>turn</i><par n="accept__vblex__sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
